Virginia statutes. Title 10.1. Conservation.
Article 1. General Provisions.
§ 10.1-1322.01.
(Repealed effective July 1, 2022) Permits; procedures for public hearings and permits before the Board.

During the public comment period on a permit action, interested persons may request a public hearing to contest such action or the terms and conditions thereof. Where public hearings are mandatory under state or federal law or regulation, interested persons may request, during the public comment period on the permit action, that the Board consider the permit action pursuant to the requirements of this section.

Requests for a public hearing or Board consideration shall contain the following information:

The name, mailing address, and telephone number of the requester;

The names and addresses of all persons for whom the requester is acting as a representative (for the purposes of this requirement, an unincorporated association is a person);

The reason why a public hearing or Board consideration is requested;

A brief, informal statement setting forth the factual nature and the extent of the interest of the requester or of the persons for whom the requester is acting as representative in the application or tentative determination, including an explanation of how and to what extent such interest would be directly and adversely affected by the issuance, denial, modification, or revocation of the permit in question; and

Where possible, specific references to the terms and conditions of the permit in question, together with suggested revisions and alterations of those terms and conditions that the requester considers are needed to conform the permit to the intent and provisions of the State Air Pollution Control Law (§

10.1-1300

et seq.).

Upon completion of the public comment period on a permit action, the Director shall review all timely requests for public hearing or Board consideration filed during the public comment period on the permit action and within 30 calendar days following the expiration of the time period for the submission of requests shall grant a public hearing or Board consideration after the public hearing required by state or federal law or regulation, unless the permittee or applicant agrees to a later date, if the Director finds the following:

That there is a significant public interest in the issuance, denial, modification, or revocation of the permit in question as evidenced by receipt of a minimum of 25 individual requests for a public hearing or Board consideration;

That the requesters raise substantial, disputed issues relevant to the issuance, denial, modification, or revocation of the permit in question; and

That the action requested by the interested party is not on its face inconsistent with, or in violation of, the State Air Pollution Control Law (§

10.1-1300

et seq.), federal law or any regulation promulgated thereunder.

Either the Director or a majority of the Board members, acting independently, may request a meeting of the Board to be convened within 20 days of the Director’s decision pursuant to subsection C in order to review such decision and determine by a majority vote of the Board whether or not to grant a public hearing or Board consideration, or to delegate the permit to the Director for his decision.For purposes of this subsection, if a Board meeting is held via electronic communication means, the meeting shall be held in compliance with the provisions of § 2.2-3708.2, except that a quorum of the Board is not required to be physically assembled at one primary or central meeting location. Discussions of the Board held via such electronic communication means shall be specifically limited to a (i) review of the Director’s decision pursuant to subsection C, (ii) determination of the Board whether or not to grant a public hearing or Board consideration, or (iii) delegation of the permit to the Director for his decision. No other matter of public business shall be discussed or transacted by the Board during any such meeting held via electronic communication means.

The Director shall, forthwith, notify by mail at his last known address (i) each requester and (ii) the applicant or permittee of the decision to grant or deny a public hearing or Board consideration.

In addition to subsections C, D, and E, the Director may, in his discretion, convene a public hearing on a permit action or submit a permit action to the Board for its consideration.

If a determination is made to hold a public hearing, the Director shall schedule the hearing at a time between 45 and 75 days after mailing of the notice required by subsection E.

The Director shall cause, or require the applicant to publish, notice of a public hearing to be published once, in a newspaper of general circulation in the city or county where the facility or operation that is the subject of the permit or permit application is located, at least 30 days before the hearing date.

The Director may, on his own motion or at the request of the applicant or permittee, for good cause shown, reschedule the date of the public hearing. In the event the Director reschedules the date for the public hearing after notice has been published, he shall, or require the applicant to, provide reasonable notice of the new date of the public hearing. Such notice shall be published once in the same newspaper where the original notice was published.

Public hearings held pursuant to these procedures may be conducted by (i) the Board at a regular or special meeting of the Board or (ii) one or more members of the Board. A member of the Board shall preside over the public hearing.

The presiding Board member shall have the authority to maintain order, preserve the impartiality of the decision process, and conclude the hearing process expeditiously. The presiding Board member, in order to carry out his responsibilities under this subsection, is authorized to exercise the following powers, including but not limited to:

Prescribing the methods and procedures to be used in the presentation of factual data, arguments, and proof orally and in writing including the imposition of reasonable limitations on the time permitted for oral testimony;

Consolidating the presentation of factual data, arguments, and proof to avoid repetitive presentation of them;

Ruling on procedural matters; and

Acting as custodian of the record of the public hearing causing all notices and written submittals to be entered in it.

The public comment period will remain open for 15 days after the close of the public hearing if required by §

10.1-1307.01

.

When the public hearing is conducted by less than a quorum of the Board, the Department shall, promptly after the close of the public hearing comment period, make a report to the Board.

After the close of the public hearing comment period, the Board shall, at a regular or special meeting, take final action on the permit. Such decision shall be issued within 90 days of the close of the public comment period or from a later date, as agreed to by the permittee or applicant and the Board or the Director. The Board shall not take any action on a permit where a public hearing was convened solely to satisfy the requirements of state or federal law or regulation unless the permit was provided to the Board for its consideration pursuant to the provisions of this section.

When the public hearing was conducted by less than a quorum of the Board, persons who commented during the public comment period shall be afforded an opportunity at the Board meeting when final action is scheduled to respond to any summaries of the public comments prepared by the Department for the Board’s consideration subject to such reasonable limitations on the time permitted for oral testimony or presentation of repetitive material as are determined by the Board.

In making its decision, the Board shall consider (i) the verbal and written comments received during the public comment period made part of the record, (ii) any explanation of comments previously received during the public comment period made at the Board meeting, (iii) the comments and recommendation of the Department, and (iv) the agency files. When the decision of the Board is to adopt the recommendation of the Department, the Board shall provide in writing a clear and concise statement of the legal basis and justification for the decision reached. When the decision of the Board varies from the recommendation of the Department, the Board shall, in consultation with legal counsel, provide a clear and concise statement explaining the reason for the variation and how the Board’s decision is in compliance with applicable laws and regulations. The written statement shall be provided contemporaneously with the decision of the Board. Copies of the decision, certified by the Director, shall be mailed by certified mail to the permittee or applicant.

History.

2008, cc. 276, 557; 2009, c. 627; 2018, c. 55.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2008, cc. 276 and 557, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act do not apply to any permit action public noticed prior to July 1, 2008.”

Acts 2008, cc. 276 and 557, cl. 3 provides: “That regulatory actions necessary to implement the provisions of this act are exempt from Article 2 (§ 2.2-4006 et seq.) of the Administrative Process Act.”

Acts 2008, cc. 276 and 557, cl. 4 provides: “That State Air Pollution Control Board members appointed before July 1, 2008, shall continue in office for the terms for which appointed. For the two additional members, one member shall be appointed for a term of four years and one member shall be appointed for a term of three years. Thereafter the successors of all members shall be appointed for four-year terms. Prior to July 1, 2010, the two additional members appointed pursuant hereto shall not vote on any action related to a permit for which the State Air Pollution Control Board has exercised its authority for direct consideration as of January 1, 2008.”

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 627, in subsection D, substituted “the meeting shall be held in compliance with the provisions § 2.2-3708, except that a quorum of the Board is not required to be physically assembled at one primary or central meeting location” for “the Board shall have at least one forum open to the public and individual Board members may participate from any location regardless of whether it is open to the public” and added the last two sentences; and rewrote subsection J.

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendment by c. 55, in the second paragraph of subsection D, twice substituted “electronic communication means” for “electronic communication” and substituted “provisions of § 2.2-3708.2” for “provisions § 2.2-3708.”

Law Review.

For annual survey article, see “Environmental Law,” see 44 U. Rich. L. Rev. 423 (2009).

§ 10.1-1322.01.
Repealed by Acts 2022, c. 356, cl. 2.

History.

2008, cc. 276, 557; 2009, c. 627; 2018, c. 55; repealed by 2022, c. 356.

§ 10.1-1322.5.
Virginia Electric Vehicle Grant Fund and Program; report.

As used in this section:“Department” means the Department of Environmental Quality.“Electric school bus” means a school bus that is propelled to a significant extent by an electric motor that draws electricity from a battery and is capable of being recharged from an external source of electricity.“Fund” means the Virginia Electric Vehicle Grant Fund established in subsection B.“Fund and Program project” means all or any part of projects pursued for the Fund and Program that are necessary and desirable for (i) reducing air pollution in order to protect the health of Virginians; (ii) increasing the number and use of electric school buses in Virginia; (iii) replacing commercial vehicles or heavy equipment in Virginia that use fossil fuels with electric vehicles or equivalents that reduce air emissions; (iv) ensuring a broad geographic distribution of grant awards; and (v) creating employment opportunities for Virginians.“Program” means the Virginia Electric Vehicle Grant Program established pursuant to subsection C.“School bus” has the same meaning as the term “schoolbus” as defined in 49 U.S.C. § 30125, and its successor amendments.

There is hereby created in the state treasury a special nonreverting fund to be known as the Virginia Electric Vehicle Grant Fund. The Fund shall be established on the books of the Comptroller. All funds appropriated for such purpose, and any gifts, donations, grants, bequests, and other funds received on its behalf, shall be paid into the state treasury and credited to the Fund. Interest earned on moneys in the Fund shall remain in the Fund and be credited to it. Any moneys remaining in the Fund, including interest thereon, at the end of each fiscal year shall not revert to the general fund but shall remain in the Fund. Moneys in the Fund shall be used solely for the purposes of (i) awarding grants on a competitive basis through the Program established pursuant to subsection C or (ii) implementing and administering the Program. Moneys used for implementing and administering the Fund and Program shall be limited to amounts necessary to implement the Fund and Program. Expenditures and disbursements from the Fund shall be made by the State Treasurer on warrants issued by the Comptroller upon written request signed by the Director of the Department.

The Virginia Electric Vehicle Grant Program is hereby established for the purpose of awarding grants on a competitive basis to Fund and Program projects pursuant to subsection D from such funds as may be available from the Fund. The Department shall oversee each grant awarded through the Program and ensure thorough annual reporting on each such grant. The Program shall be administered by the Department. In administering the Program, the Department shall consult with other departments and stakeholders described in subsection E to publish guidelines and criteria for grant awards, including guidelines and criteria governing agreements between the Department and grant recipients.

Grants shall be awarded for Fund and Program projects that meet these criteria, and, to the extent practicable, shall follow this order of priority: (i) Fund and Program projects by public school divisions (a) to cover the costs, in whole or in part, associated with replacing existing diesel school buses that they operate with electric school buses that reduce air emissions; (b) to implement recharging infrastructure or other infrastructure needed to charge or maintain such electric school buses; and (c) to train workers according to labor standards to be developed by the Department to support the maintenance, charging, and operations of such electric school buses and (ii) Fund and Program projects by public, private, or nonprofit entities in Virginia (a) to assist with replacing commercial motor vehicles, heavy equipment, or other machinery owned and operated by the entities that are used in Virginia that rely on diesel fuels with electric vehicles or equivalent equipment that reduce air emissions and (b) to implement recharging infrastructure or other infrastructure needed to charge or maintain such electric vehicles or equivalent equipment.

The Department shall consult with the Department of Energy, the Department of Transportation, the Department of Education, and other agencies of the Commonwealth, as well as organizations with expertise in the climate and public health, and other interested stakeholders, to adopt necessary policies and procedures for administering the Fund and Program and for determining eligibility, qualifications, terms, conditions, and other requirements for Fund and Program projects. The criteria for prioritizing Fund and Program projects by public school divisions shall take into consideration geographic areas with high asthma rates, lowest measured air quality, and level of air emission from existing school buses.

Notwithstanding any provision to the contrary, in no event shall any allocation of funds be made to the Fund or the Program unless federal funds or nonstate funds are available to cover the entire cost of such allocation.

The Department shall submit an annual report to the General Assembly regarding administration of the Fund and Program for the preceding fiscal year. The report shall include the number of grants awarded, the number of vehicles or equipment replaced, the number of jobs supported, and, to the extent available, the general environmental or health impact of the Fund and Program. The report shall be furnished to the Chairmen of the House Committee on Appropriations and the Senate Committee on Finance and Appropriations no later than November 1 of each year. However, no annual report shall be required if the Fund and Program do not receive funding.

History.

2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 418.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 418, cl. 2 provides: “That the Department of Environmental Quality shall, as funding becomes available, convene a work group consisting of representatives from relevant state agencies, as well as from labor unions and from education, energy, environment, health, manufacturing, technology, and transportation sectors, and other interested stakeholders to develop recommendations for establishing and administering the Virginia Electric Vehicle Grant Fund (the Fund) and the Virginia Electric Vehicle Grant Program (the Program) and identifying and developing strategies for obtaining dedicated streams of revenues for the Fund, including from the federal government and from corporate, philanthropic, nonprofit, or other entities. Recommendations for administering the Program shall include criteria that prioritizes public school divisions that (i) serve the most students who live in areas with the highest asthma rates and lowest measured air quality; (ii) allow the grants to be distributed equitably to serve students who live in rural or low-income areas; (iii) maximize the use of grants through other incentives that public school divisions undertake, such as participating in local transparent and competitive public-private partnerships, achieving further reductions in air emissions by, for example, installing solar panels to power the infrastructure for electric school buses; and (iv) enter into project labor agreements that pay the local prevailing wage rate, participate in registered apprenticeship programs, and establish preferences for hiring veterans, local workers, women, and workers from historically economically disadvantaged communities for work related to the Program. Upon completion, the work group shall report its recommendations to the Chairmen of the House Committee on Appropriations and the Senate Committee on Finance and Appropriations.”

At the direction of the Virginia Code Commission, “Department of Energy” was substituted for “Department of Mines, Minerals and Energy” to conform to the name change by Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 532, effective October 1, 2021.

Effective date.

This section is effective July 1, 2021.

§ 10.1-1322.1.
Air Pollution Permit Program Fund established; use of moneys.

Notwithstanding the provisions of § 2.2-1802, all moneys collected pursuant to §§

10.1-1322

and

10.1-1322.2

shall be paid into the state treasury and credited to a special nonreverting fund known as the Air Pollution Permit Program Fund, which is hereby established.

Any moneys remaining in the Fund shall not revert to the general fund but shall remain in the Fund. Interest earned on such moneys shall remain in the Fund and be credited to it.

The Department of Air Pollution Control is authorized and empowered to release moneys from the Fund, on warrants issued by the State Comptroller, for the purposes of carrying out the provisions of this chapter under the direction of the Executive Director.

An accounting of moneys received by and distributed from the permit fund shall be kept by the Comptroller and furnished upon request to the Governor or the General Assembly.

History.

1992, c. 488.

§ 10.1-1322.2.
Preliminary program permit fees.

Prior to the adoption and implementation of a permit fee schedule as authorized under subsection B of §

10.1-1322

, the owners of sources of air pollution which are registered by the Department in accordance with the regulations of the Board are assessed preliminary program permit fees on an annual basis in accordance with subsection C of this section. These fees shall be deposited in the Air Pollution Permit Program Fund established by §

10.1-1322.1

. The Department shall issue annual notices of the fees to owners of registered sources on or before August 1 of each fiscal year. Each notice of a fee shall include a summary of the data on which the fee is based. Fees shall be payable thirty days after receipt of notice. Failure to make timely payment within ninety days shall be grounds to institute a collection action against the owner of the registered source by the Attorney General.

The provisions of this section shall be applicable to all owners in cases where the aggregate of all pollutants emitted (as calculated or estimated) by all sources owned or controlled by the same owner, or by any entity controlling, controlled by, or under common control with such owner, are greater than 500 tons per year. Any individual stationary source with actual emissions (as calculated or estimated) of less than 100 tons per year shall not be subject to a fee under subsection C of this section. Determination of the tons per year of air pollution shall be based on all actual pollutants emitted during the prior calendar year.

The Department shall assess preliminary program permit fees uniformly, based on the aggregate of all pollutants emitted (as calculated or estimated) during the calendar year immediately preceding the fiscal year, in an amount calculated to produce revenue totaling $3.1 million. In no instance shall a preliminary fee assessed in any calendar year exceed $100,000 per source. The establishment of a fee schedule under this subsection shall be exempt from the provisions of Article 2 (§ 2.2-4006 et seq.) of Chapter 40 of Title 2.2.

Notices of preliminary program permit fees shall not be issued for any fiscal year in which the fees for the operating permit program are in effect in accordance with regulations adopted pursuant to subsection B of §

10.1-1322

. Should a permit program fee become due and payable during a fiscal year when the owner has paid a preliminary program permit fee, the permit program fee shall be reduced in an amount equal to the pro rata share of the preliminary program permit fee for the months remaining in the fiscal year. The pro rata share is determined by dividing the fee into twelve equal parts and multiplying that sum by the number of months remaining in the fiscal year.

Utilization of the fees collected pursuant to this section shall be limited to the agency’s direct and indirect costs of processing permits in order to more efficiently issue permits and to prepare for and begin implementation of the federal Clean Air Act requirements. The fees shall be exempt from statewide indirect costs charged and collected by the Department of Accounts.

Fees collected pursuant to this section shall not supplant or reduce in any way the general fund appropriation to the Department.

History.

1992, c. 488.

Cross references.

As to exemptions, generally, to the Administrative Process Act, see § 2.2-4002.

§ 10.1-1322.3.
Emissions trading programs; emissions credits; Board to promulgate regulations.

In accordance with §

10.1-1308

, the Board may promulgate regulations to provide for emissions trading programs to achieve and maintain the National Ambient Air Quality Standards established by the United States Environmental Protection Agency, under the federal Clean Air Act. The regulations shall create an air emissions banking and trading program for the Commonwealth, to the extent not prohibited by federal law, that results in net air emission reductions, creates an economic incentive for reducing air emissions, and allows for continued economic growth through a program of banking and trading credits or allowances. The regulations applicable to the electric power industry shall foster competition in the electric power industry, encourage construction of clean, new generating facilities, provide without charge new source set-asides of five percent for the first five plan years and two percent per year thereafter, and provide an initial allocation period of five years. In promulgating such regulations the Board shall consider, but not be limited to, the inclusion of provisions concerning (i) the definition and use of emissions reduction credits or allowances from mobile and stationary sources, (ii) the role of offsets in emissions trading, (iii) interstate or regional emissions trading, (iv) the mechanisms needed to facilitate emissions trading and banking, and (v) the role of emissions allocations in emissions trading. No regulations shall prohibit the direct trading of air emissions credits or allowances between private industries, provided such trades do not adversely impact air quality in Virginia.

History.

1994, c. 204; 1999, c. 1022; 2001, c. 580; 2004, c. 334.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2001, c. 580, cl. 2, provides: “That the provision of this act shall not be construed to require the State Air Pollution Control Board to reinitiate the regulatory process for the development of the regulations required by this act and that any changes made to comply with the provisions of this act may be made following the public comment period on the proposed regulations approved for public comment by the State Air Pollution Control Board on November 8, 2000.”

Acts 2004, c. 334, cl. 2, provides: “Nothing in this act, however, shall be construed to interfere with, apply to, or affect the auction of Virginia’s allocation of nitrogen oxide pollution credits set aside for new sources of electric power generation and other facilities for the years 2004 and 2005 as authorized by Chapter 1042 of the Acts of Assembly of 2003.”

The 1999 amendment,

in the first sentence, substituted “may” for “shall” following “with §

10.1-1308

, the Board,” substituted “emissions trading” for “market-based” preceding “programs to achieve and maintain”; in the second sentence, substituted “an” for “a voluntary” preceding “air emissions banking and trading,” deleted “full” preceding “extend not prohibited by federal law,” deleted “voluntary” preceding “program of banking and trading credits” and added “or allowances”; in the third sentence, in clause (i), inserted “or allowances,” deleted “and” at the end of clause (iii), in clause (iv), deleted “voluntary” following “mechanisms needed to facilitate” and added “and” at the end thereof, and added clause (v); and in the fourth sentence, inserted “or allowances” following “direct trading of air emissions credits” and added “provided such trades do not adversely impact air quality in Virginia.”

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendment by c. 580 added the third sentence.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 334 inserted “without charge” in the third sentence.

Law Review.

For 2000 survey of Virginia environmental law, see 34 U. Rich. L. Rev. 799 (2000).

§ 10.1-1322.4.
(Effective until July 1, 2022) Permit modifications for alternative fuels or raw materials.

Unless required by federal law or regulation, no additional permit or permit modifications shall be required by the Board for the use, by any source, of an alternative fuel or raw material, if the owner demonstrates to the Board that as a result of trial burns at his facility or other facilities or other sufficient data that the emissions resulting from the use of the alternative fuel or raw material supply are decreased. To the extent allowed by federal law or regulation, no demonstration shall be required for the use of processed animal fat, processed fish oil, processed vegetable oil, distillate oil, or any mixture thereof in place of the same quantity of residual oil to fire industrial boilers.

History.

1994, c. 717; 2008, c. 282.

The number of this section

was assigned by the Virginia Code Commission, the number in the 1994 act having been

10.1-1322.3

.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2008, c. 282, cl. 2, provides: “That the Air Pollution Control Board shall adopt regulations within 180 days after enactment providing that: (i) when determining whether a physical or operational change at an existing stationary source requires a permit or permit amendment under the minor new source review regulations, any change in emissions shall be calculated as the difference between the source’s pre-change and postchange annual uncontrolled emission rates; and (ii) such regulations shall remain in effect until the Board changes those provisions of its minor new source regulations concerning the manner in which such change in emissions is calculated. For purposes of clause (i), the term ‘uncontrolled emission rate’ means the emission rate from an emissions unit when operating at maximum capacity without air pollution control equipment. Air pollution control equipment includes control equipment that is not vital to its operation, except that its use enables the owner to conform to applicable air pollution control laws and regulations. Annual uncontrolled emissions shall be based on the maximum annual rated capacity (based on 8,760 hours of operation per year) of the emissions unit, unless the emissions unit or stationary source is subject to state and federally enforceable permit conditions that limit the annual hours of operation. Enforceable permit conditions on the type or amount of material combusted, stored, or processed may be used in determining the uncontrolled emission rate of an emissions unit or stationary source. The uncontrolled emission rate of a stationary source is the sum of the uncontrolled emission rates of the individual emissions units. Secondary emissions do not count in determining the uncontrolled emission rate of a stationary source.”

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendment by c. 282 substituted “federal law or regulation” for “the federal government” and “his facility” for “their facility” in the first sentence; added the second sentence and made a minor stylistic change.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by c. 356 in the first sentence, deleted “by the Board” following “shall be required” and “to the Board” following “demonstrates.”

Law Review.

For annual survey article, see “Environmental Law,” see 44 U. Rich. L. Rev. 423 (2009).

§ 10.1-1322.4.
(Effective July 1, 2022) Permit modifications for alternative fuels or raw materials.

Unless required by federal law or regulation, no additional permit or permit modifications shall be required for the use, by any source, of an alternative fuel or raw material, if the owner demonstrates that as a result of trial burns at his facility or other facilities or other sufficient data that the emissions resulting from the use of the alternative fuel or raw material supply are decreased. To the extent allowed by federal law or regulation, no demonstration shall be required for the use of processed animal fat, processed fish oil, processed vegetable oil, distillate oil, or any mixture thereof in place of the same quantity of residual oil to fire industrial boilers.

History.

1994, c. 717; 2008, c. 282; 2022, c. 356.